Georgia, session 2025_26, HB787.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
(a) As used in this Act, the term:
(1) "Ad valorem taxes for municipal purposes" means all ad valorem taxes for municipal
purposes levied by, for, or on behalf of the City of Chickamauga, including, but not
limited to, any ad valorem taxes to pay interest on and to retire municipal bonded
indebtedness.
H. B. 787
- 1 -

LC 61 0213/AP
(2) "Homestead" means homestead as defined and qualified in Code Section 48-5-40 of
the O.C.G.A., as amended, with the additional qualification that it shall include not more
than five contiguous acres of homestead property.
(3) "Senior citizen" means a person who is 70 years of age or older and has been a
resident of the City of Chickamauga for at least five years on or before January 1 of the
year in which application for the exemption under subsection (b) of this section is made.
(b) Each resident of the City of Chickamauga who is a senior citizen is granted an exemption
on such person's homestead from City of Chickamauga ad valorem taxes for municipal
purposes in the amount of $50,000.00 of the assessed value of such homestead. The value
of that property in excess of such exempted amount shall remain subject to taxation. The
unremarried surviving spouse of the person who has been granted the exemption provided
for in this subsection shall continue to receive the exemption, provided that the unremarried
surviving spouse is 67 years of age or older and continues to occupy the home as a residence
and homestead.
(c) A person shall not receive the homestead exemption granted by subsection (b) of this
section unless such person or person's agent files an application with the governing authority
of the City of Chickamauga, or the designee thereof, giving such person's age and such
additional information relative to receiving such exemption as will enable the governing
authority of the City of Chickamauga, or the designee thereof, to make a determination
regarding the initial and continuing eligibility of such person for such exemption. The
governing authority of the City of Chickamauga, or the designee thereof, shall provide
application forms for this purpose.
(d) The exemption shall be claimed and returned as provided in Code Section 48-5-50.1 of
the O.C.G.A., as amended. The exemption shall be automatically renewed from year to year
so long as the person granted the homestead exemption under subsection (b) of this section
occupies the residence as a homestead. After such person has filed the proper application as
provided in subsection (c) of this section, it shall not be necessary to make application
H. B. 787
- 2 -

LC 61 0213/AP
thereafter for any year, and such exemption shall continue to be allowed to such person. It
shall be the duty of any such person granted the homestead exemption under subsection (b)
of this section to notify the governing authority of the City of Chickamauga, or the designee
thereof, in the event that such person for any reason becomes ineligible for such exemption.
(e) The exemption granted by subsection (b) of this section shall not apply to or affect any
state ad valorem taxes, county ad valorem taxes for county purposes, or county or
independent school district ad valorem taxes for educational purposes. The homestead
exemption granted by subsection (b) of this section shall be in lieu of and not in addition to
any other homestead exemption applicable to City of Chickamauga ad valorem taxes for
municipal purposes.
(f) The exemption granted by subsection (b) of this section shall apply to all taxable years
beginning on or after January 1, 2026.
SECTION 2.
In accordance with the requirements of Article VII, Section II of the Constitution of the State
of Georgia, this Act shall not become law unless it receives the requisite two-thirds' majority
vote in both the Senate and the House of Representatives.
SECTION 3.
The municipal election superintendent of the City of Chickamauga shall call and conduct an
election as provided in this section for the purpose of submitting this Act to the electors of
the City of Chickamauga for approval or rejection. The municipal election superintendent
shall conduct that election on the Tuesday after the first Monday in November, 2025, and
shall issue the call and conduct that election as provided by general law. The municipal
election superintendent shall cause the date and purpose of the election to be published once
a week for two weeks immediately preceding the date thereof in the official organ of Walker
County. The ballot shall have written or printed thereon the words:
H. B. 787
- 3 -

LC 61 0213/AP
"( ) YES Shall the Act be approved which provides a homestead exemption from City
of Chickamauga ad valorem taxes for municipal purposes in the amount of
( ) NO $50,000.00 of the assessed value of the homestead for residents of that city
who are 70 years of age or older and have been residents of that city for at
least five years?"
All persons desiring to vote for approval of the Act shall vote "Yes," and all persons desiring
to vote for rejection of the Act shall vote "No." If more than one-half of the votes cast on
such question are for approval of the Act, Section 1 of this Act shall become of full force and
effect on January 1, 2026. If the Act is not so approved or if the election is not conducted
as provided in this section, Section 1 of this Act shall not become effective, and this Act shall
be automatically repealed on the 365th calendar day following the election date provided for
in this section. The expense of such election shall be borne by the City of Chickamauga. It
shall be the municipal election superintendent's duty to certify the result thereof to the
Secretary of State. The provisions of this section shall be mandatory upon the municipal
election superintendent and are not intended as directory. If the municipal election
superintendent fails or refuses to comply with this section, any elector of the City of
Chickamauga may apply for a writ of mandamus to compel the municipal election
superintendent to perform his or her duties under this section. If the court finds that the
municipal election superintendent has not complied with this section, the court shall fashion
appropriate relief requiring the municipal election superintendent to call and conduct such
election on the date required by this section or on the next date authorized for special
elections provided for in Code Section 21-2-540 of the O.C.G.A.
SECTION 4.
Except as otherwise provided in Section 3 of this Act, this Act shall become effective upon
its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law without such approval.
H. B. 787
- 4 -

LC 61 0213/AP
SECTION 5.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 787
- 5 -